Georgia, session 2025_26, HB4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 5 of Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to Brady Law Regulations, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"16-11-172.1.
(a) No purchase or transfer of a firearm conducted by a licensed importer, licensed
manufacturer, or licensed dealer shall be completed until the third day after the initiation
of such purchase or transfer; provided, however, that the calculation of the three days shall
not include Saturdays, Sundays, or state or federal holidays and provided, further, that the
H. B. 4
- 1 -

LC 57 0152
NICS check provided for under Code Section 16-11-172 may be conducted within the three
days.
(b) Licensed importers, licensed manufacturers, and licensed dealers shall, during normal
business hours, make records available for inspection by any law enforcement agency for
purposes of any criminal investigation.
(c) Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply when a firearm is being purchased
by or transferred to:
(1) The holder of a weapons carry license issued pursuant to Code Section 16-11-129;
or
(2) Any person provided for under Code Section 16-11-130.
(d) Any licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, or licensed dealer that violates this Code
section, or any purchaser or transferee who uses fraud or false representation to avoid the
requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five
years."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 4
- 2 -